North Carolina, session 2025, SB373.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 1A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-21.5A. Treatment of minors through vaccination schedule.
(a) A health care practitioner shall not refuse to accept a minor as a patient in their
medical practice or at a hospital solely on the basis of the minor's refusal or the minor's parent,
guardian, or custodian's refusal to comply with timing or frequency of the recommended
vaccination and immunization schedule as set forth in the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention's Child Immunization Schedule. A refusal to have a vaccination altogether under this
section shall not be construed to supersede a requirement under G.S. 130A-152 set forth by the
Commission for Public Health; however, a variance in recommended schedule or delay in
administration of a recommended vaccination shall be allowed under G.S. 130A-152(c)(1).
(b) For the purpose of this section, the term "health care practitioner" means a physician
licensed to practice medicine under Article 1 of this Chapter, a physician assistant, or advanced
practice registered nurse licensed to administer immunizations or vaccinations under their
respective scope of licensure.
(c) Violation of this section shall constitute unprofessional conduct under each health
care practitioner's occupational licensing board."
SECTION 2.(a) The North Carolina Medical Board and North Carolina Board of
Nursing shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 2.(b) The Commission for Public Health shall adopt rules to allow for
exemptions under G.S. 130A-152(c)(1) for minors who elect to delay the administration of an
immunization or vaccination under this section.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective October 1, 2025. The remainder
of this act is effective when it becomes law.
*S373-v-1*